Missouri, session 2026, HB2017.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, and program described herein for the item or items stated, and
for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period beginning
July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the unexpended balances available as of June 30, 2026,
but not to exceed the amounts stated herein, as follows:
Section 17.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Special Acres School for the Severely Disabled
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.005, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.005, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 2
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,593,046
Section 17.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Autumn Hill State School
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.007, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.010, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,023,372
Section 17.020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a school district located in any city with more than thirty-six
thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
for equipment, design, renovation, construction, and
improvements of a career and technical school located in any city
with more than thirty-six thousand five hundred but fewer than
forty thousand inhabitants, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.149, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.020,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$220,166
Section 17.030. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Vocational-Technical Education Enhancement Grant award
program, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.165, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 3
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
Section 17.040. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For repair or replacement of an elevator in a library located in any city
with more than one thousand three hundred but fewer than one
thousand five hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than
twenty-five thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.326, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 17.046. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a tri-share model based on income for the childcare of dependents of
first responders, located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.372, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.050. To the University of Missouri
For the design and construction of a new veterinary laboratory, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local
match rate in order to be eligible for state funds pursuant to
Section 173.480, RSMo
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.170, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.040,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$889,925
Section 17.055. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 4
For the design, planning, and construction, to include equipment and lab
space, of a manufacturing innovation center in a city not within a
county, provided that local matching funds must be provided on
a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.260, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.050,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$14,329,042
Section 17.060. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri Fisher Delta Research, Extension and
Education Center, for the continuation of the construction for the
soil laboratory and maintenance on existing structures, provided
that no local match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.262, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.060,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,708,639
Section 17.065. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri Fisher Delta Research, Extension and
Education Center, for the construction, maintenance, repairs,
improvements, upgrades and maintenance on existing structures,
to the greenhouse and farm buildings, provided that no local
match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.263, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.065,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 5
Section 17.075. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri
For the planning, design, and construction of the Radioisotope Science
Center at the University of Missouri Research Reactor (MURR)
on the Columbia campus
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.005, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$50,000,000
Section 17.080. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the acquisition, renovation, planning, design, equipment, furniture,
programs, and services for a non-profit organization established
in 2018, to provide training for inmates released from prison,
young people in Family Court Division, veterans, and others with
an opportunity to enter a pre-apprenticeship program to receive
construction skills, math, blueprint reading, workplace
interpersonal skills, goal setting, financial literacy, conflict
resolution, entrepreneurship, and job certifications that is located
in any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3, Section 3.210, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$750,000
Section 17.085. To Southeast Missouri State University,
For a non-profit organization that enable all young people to reach their
full potential as productive, caring and responsible citizens, for a
building located in any city with more than three thousand four
hundred but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants
and located in a county with more than twenty-five thousand but
fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than eight thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
inhabitants

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 6
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3, Section 3.415, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 17.090. To Truman State University,
For the Greenwood Interprofessional Autism Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3, Section 3.430, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$575,000
Section 17.100. To the Department of Transportation
For improvements, renovations, maintenance and repair at an airport
located in any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.321, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.080,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$762,600
Section 17.105. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing three
lanes in each direction on I-70 to be funded from state road bond
proceeds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.428, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.701,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-70 Project Bond Proceeds Fund (1323) .........................$925,662,390
Section 17.110. To the Department of Transportation

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 7
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing three
lanes in each direction on I-70 pursuant to a financing agreement
between the Commission and the Office of Administration
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.429, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.702,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-70 Project Fund (1324) ...............................................$1,373,813,346
Section 17.115. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing on I-44
from Missouri Route T to Missouri Route 68, from US Route 160
to Missouri Route 125, and from I-49 to Missouri Route 249 and
rebuild pavement and improve the I-44/Route 13 interchange and
the I-44/I-49 interchange and other I-44 Tier 2 and Tier 3 projects
listed on the Unfunded Needs List, to be funded from state road
bond proceeds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.433, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.703,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-44 Improvement Bond Proceeds Fund (1337) ...............$363,750,000
Section 17.120. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing on I-44
from Missouri Route T to Missouri Route 68, from US Route 160
to Missouri Route 125, and from I-49 to Missouri Route 249 and
rebuild pavement and improve the I-44/Route 13 interchange and
the I-44/I-49 interchange and other I-44 Tier 2 and Tier 3 projects
listed on the Unfunded Needs List pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Commission and the Office of
Administration
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.434, an Act of the 102nd

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 8
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.704,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From State Road Fund I-44 Improvement Fund (1338) ........................................$213,441,925
Section 17.125. To the Department of Transportation
For a transportation cost-share program with local communities,
provided that these funds shall not supplant, and shall only
supplement, the current planned allocation of road and bridge
expenditures under the most recently adopted state transportation
and improvement plan, including all amendments thereto, as of
the date of passage of this bill by the General Assembly, and
provided that the Department of Transportation and the
Department of Economic Development work cooperatively to
select projects with the greatest economic benefit to the State
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.445, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.706,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$55,919,465
Section 17.130. To the Department of Transportation
For an environmental impact study related to improvements to the
Interstate 44 corridor
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.446, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.707,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,956,605
Section 17.135. To the Department of Transportation
For distribution to a county with more than two hundred thousand but
fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, for the
planning, design, and construction of a bridge and improvements
to the two roads connected by said bridge, as well as other
intersection improvements related to an economic development
project, provided that no local matching funds shall be required

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 9
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.447, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.708,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,868,192
Section 17.140. To the Department of Transportation
For an engineering study and work on Highway BB bridge over Interstate
35 in a city with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand
inhabitants and improving the exit and entrance ramps for said
intersection and route BB east of said intersection
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.455, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.711,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$779,920
Section 17.145. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, right of way acquisition, utility improvements
and relocation, upgrades and construction of U.S. Highway 67 in
any county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.712,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$58,526,774
From State Road Fund (1320)............................................................................. 90,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$148,526,774
Section 17.150. To the Department of Transportation
For the maintenance, repair and upgrades to LeCompte Road, located in
any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 10
than two hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that no local
match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.713,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,698,155
Section 17.155. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, designing and constructing of an interchange and outer
services road improvements in the Interstate 70 corridor in any
county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight
thousand but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.714,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$31,710,024
Section 17.160. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an intersection and road
improvements on US Highway 65 and Missouri Route B in any
county with more than forty-two thousand but fewer than forty-
four thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
twenty thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.716,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,700,000
Section 17.165. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an interchange and road
improvements on I-49 and US Highway 58 in any county with
more than one hundred five thousand but fewer than one hundred

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 11
ten thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
ten thousand but fewer than twelve thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.717,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,859,941
Section 17.170. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, designing, construction and improvements of U.S.
Highway 63 in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.718,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 17.175. To the Department of Transportation
For planning, designing, acquisition, and construction of additional
passing lanes on U.S. Highway 65 between any city with more
than three thousand but fewer than three thousand four hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
thousand but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants
and any city with more than two thousand one hundred fifty but
fewer than two thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in
a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than one thousand but fewer than two thousand two
hundred twenty inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.719,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 12
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$37,880,083
Section 17.180. To the Department of Transportation
For the Maintenance Program
For the maintenance and repair of low-volume routes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.460, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.721,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,487,581
Section 17.185. To the Department of Transportation
For protection of the public against hazards existing at railroad crossings
pursuant to Chapter 389, RSMo
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.540, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.723,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,640,548
Section 17.190. To the Department of Transportation
For a city with more than six thousand three hundred but fewer than
seven thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more
than two hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty
thousand inhabitants for an additional two trains to stop at a train
station per day, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.531, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.724,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.195. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 13
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, including land acquisition,
pursuant to the provisions of the State Block Grant Program
administered through the Federal Airport Improvement Program
and the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.726,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,367,812
Section 17.200. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and improvements of an airport in a city with
more than thirty-six thousand five hundred but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds shall
be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.727,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$350,000
Section 17.205. To the Department of Transportation
For the construction of a commercial terminal facility at a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer than seven
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.505, an Act of the 99th
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.728,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,998,337
Section 17.210. To the Department of Transportation

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 14
For the planning, design, and construction of an aircraft maintenance
facility at a joint-use military and civilian airport located in a
county with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one
hundred thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds shall be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.729,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$7,500,000
Section 17.215. To the Department of Transportation
For the relocation of the fuel farm facility at joint-use military and
civilian airport located in a county with more than eighty
thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, provided that no local matching
funds shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.731,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.220. To the Department of Transportation
For the construction and improvements of an airport terminal in any
county with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.732,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,199,773

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 15
Section 17.225. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a municipal
airport located in a city with more than forty thousand but fewer
than fifty-one thousand inhabitants partially located in a county
with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants, including land acquisition, pursuant to the provisions
of the State Block Grant Program administered through the
Federal Airport Improvement Program and the Infrastructure
Investment and Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.550, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.733,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)...................................................$3,400,000
Section 17.230. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, including land acquisition,
pursuant to the provisions of the State Block Grant Program
administered through the Federal Airport Improvement Program
and the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.550, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.734,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)...................................................$8,800,000
Section 17.235. To the Department of Transportation
For a grant to a port authority located in any county with more than two
hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand
inhabitants, for assistance in port planning, acquisition, or
construction within the port district

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 16
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.555, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.736,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$4,478,240
Section 17.240. To the Department of Transportation
For improvements to a port located in a county with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five thousand
five hundred but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants, provided
that no local matching funds shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.551, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.738,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,667,149
Section 17.245. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of a roundabout near an
international airport in city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,500,000
For repair, maintenance, and expansion of Route N in a county with more
than one hundred twenty thousand but fewer than one hundred
fifty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,197,200
For the planning, design, and construction of a climbing lane on
westbound I-44 at the intersection of I-44 and Highway 43

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 17
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................11,915,143
For road improvements in a county with more than nine thousand nine
hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than two hundred inhabitants, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local
basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,366,000
For the planning, design, and construction of on and off ramps as well as
outer road additions and upgrades at the intersection of Ingram
Road and U.S. Highway 60
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000
For the planning, design, and construction of safety and mobility
improvements at the intersections of U.S. Highway 54 with:
Route 5, Laker Pride Road, and Jack Crowell Road
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,000,000
For the planning, design, and construction of road improvements to
Business Route 63 between East Burkhart Street and Route M, to
include the intersection at Route M
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,100,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 18
For distribution to a city with more than one thousand seven hundred but
fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in
a county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants, for the
planning, design, and construction of a road spur
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
For distribution to a metropolitan planning organization serving a county
with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, for
an environmental assessment for a bridge
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................25,000
For distribution to a city with more than three thousand but fewer than
three thousand four hundred inhabitants and partially located in a
county with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than
eight hundred thousand inhabitants, for repair to a road providing
access to a city-owned landfill that, if not repaired, would impede
access to first responders in the event of an emergency
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................700,000
For the planning, design, and construction of infrastructure
improvements on Highway 76 in a city with more than twelve
thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty thousand
but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than one thousand but fewer than four thousand
inhabitants

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 19
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.490, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 4,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$37,053,343
Section 17.250. To the Department of Transportation
For the Maintenance Program
For the maintenance and repair of low-volume routes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.495, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,976,128
Section 17.255. To the Department of Transportation
For distribution to a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than
fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants for the planning, design, and construction of gates and
signals at a railroad crossing with a road
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.590, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 17.260. To the Department of Transportation
For the Aviation Program
For an advanced weather system for an airport in a county with more
than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand
but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants and
owned by a city with more than nine thousand but fewer than ten
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.600, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$600,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 20
For distribution to a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than
sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
one thousand but fewer than four thousand inhabitants for road
improvements providing access to an airport
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.600, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................200,000
For demolition, renovations, improvements, and construction at an
airport located in a county with more than one million inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.600, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,000,000
For planning, designing, and construction of an education building at an
airport located in any county with more than seventeen thousand
six hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than
ten thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.600, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,700,000
For planning, designing, renovations, improvements, and construction at
an airport located in any city with more than eighteen thousand
but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and that is the county
seat of a county with more than sixty thousand but fewer than
seventy thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.600, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,500,000
Section 17.265. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 21
For distribution to a public transit provider serving a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county for a program to accommodate the need for expanded
public transit services related to hosting the 2026 World Cup
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.536, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.270. To the Office of Administration
For repairs and renovations to the south lawn fountain located on the
Capitol Complex
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.250, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.090,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,097,913
Section 17.275. To the Office of Administration
For the repair and refurbishment of the Capitol building plumbing
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.270, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.095,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,916,642
Section 17.280. To the Office of Administration
For the repair and restoration of the bronze doors located in the Capitol
building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.130, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.120,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) ................................................................................................................$190,705

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 22
Section 17.290. To the Office of Administration
For planning, design, construction, renovation, acquisition, upgrades,
redevelopment, and unprogrammed funding for state-owned
properties statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.005, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.130, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ...................................................$5,000,000
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) .......................................................... 1,353,943
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,353,943
Section 17.295. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the State Fair
For planning, design, construction, renovation, land acquisition, and
upgrades of facilities at the State Fair
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.015, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.145, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,552,677
Section 17.300. To the Department of Agriculture
For the planning, design and construction of a meat laboratory facility
that will be used for training, education, technical support, and
research on a land grant university located in any city with more
than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.022, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.150,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,439,895

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 23
Section 17.305. To the Department of Agriculture
For the planning, design, construction, and renovation of a Veterinary
Medical Diagnostic Laboratory on a land grant university located
in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but
fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants, provided that
such building shall be named in honor of Doctor Dan Brown
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.081, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.155,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$35,949,716
Section 17.310. To the Department of Agriculture
For the planning, design and construction of a meat laboratory facility
that will be used for training, education, technical support, and
research on a land grant university located in any city with more
than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.022, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.160,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,000,000
Section 17.315. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri State Fair
For planning, design, construction, renovation, land acquisition, and
upgrades of a livestock support barn and a stalling barn at the
Missouri State Fair
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.010, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From State Fair Bond Proceeds Fund (1336) ..........................................................$55,000,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 24
Section 17.325. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.005, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.175,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .....................................$350,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................... 1,011,743
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,361,743
Section 17.330. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Big Lake State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.010, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.180,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$820,986
Section 17.335. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Cuivre River State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.015, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 25
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.185,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,664,167
Section 17.340. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Current River State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.020, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.190,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$8,571,800
Section 17.345. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Dr. Edmund A. Babler State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.025, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.195,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$3,078,597
Section 17.350. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Echo Bluff State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.030, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 26
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.200,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .......................................$36,993
Section 17.355. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Finger Lakes State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.035, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.205,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,375,463
Section 17.360. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Harry S Truman State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.040, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.210,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$871,698
Section 17.365. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Lake of the Ozarks State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.050, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 27
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.220,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$600,009
Section 17.370. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Lewis and Clark State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.055, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.225,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,132,943
Section 17.375. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Long Branch State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.060, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.230,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$2,208,293
Section 17.380. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Montauk State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.065, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.235,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 28
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,150,053
Section 17.385. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Onondaga Cave State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.070, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.240,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .........................................$2,850
Section 17.390. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at St. Francois State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.080, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.250,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$3,878,261
Section 17.395. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Stockton State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.085, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.255,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$624,927

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 29
Section 17.400. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Table Rock State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.090, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.260,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$3,976,599
Section 17.405. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Thousand Hills State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.095, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.265,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$871,698
Section 17.410. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Trail of Tears State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.100, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.270,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$790,135
Section 17.415. To the Department of Natural Resources

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 30
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Wakonda State Park, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.105, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.275,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$1,639,625
Section 17.420. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Watkins Woolen Mill State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.110, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.280,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) ..................................$3,733,248
Section 17.425. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Weston Bend State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.115, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.285,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Fund (1311) .....................................$761,009
Section 17.430. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 31
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.300, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$7,999,939
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .......................................................................3,167,047
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................... 2,542,163
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,709,149
Section 17.435. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Nathan and Olive Boone Homestead Historic Site
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.025, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.305, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$151,498
Section 17.440. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Bryant Creek State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.040, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 32
Section 17.320, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$452,719
Section 17.445. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Big Oak Tree State Park Boardwalk
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.045, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.325, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$392,747
Section 17.450. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of the
Pelster House Barn
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.050, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.330, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ....................................................$268,373
Section 17.455. To the Department of Natural Resources
For maintenance, repair, and other improvements to state-owned historic
properties and other state-owned historical assets in Missouri
connected to African American history and culture in Missouri
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.053, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.335, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ...........................................................................$1,571,356

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 33
Section 17.460. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.170, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.350,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$7,594,068
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .......................................................................5,244,069
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................... 1,679,610
Total .........................................................................................................................$14,517,747
Section 17.465. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of the
Route 66 State Park Historic Bridge
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.175, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017, Section
17.355, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .....................................................................$6,000,000
Section 17.470. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Shepherd of the Hills State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.180, an Act of the 102nd

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 34
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.360,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .....................................................................$2,567,592
Section 17.475. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at Big Lake State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.185, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.365,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ........................................................................$896,958
Section 17.480. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure improvements and projects for any county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twelve
thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand inhabitants,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation
be matched on a 75/25 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.340,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$29,175,065
For water infrastructure improvements and projects for any city with
more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 35
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.340,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 373,633
Total .........................................................................................................................$29,548,698
Section 17.485. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure improvements and projects located in any city
with more than seven hundred sixty but fewer than eight hundred
fifty-five inhabitants and located in a county with more than six
thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than three hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.345,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,221,878
For the maintenance, repair, and capital improvements for sewer updates
located in any village with more than eighteen but fewer than
twenty-six inhabitants and located in a county with more than
fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than twelve thousand six hundred but
fewer than fifteen thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.345,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................15,000
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements for a sewer project located in a city with more than
seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and that
is the county seat of a county with more than thirty-five thousand
but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants, provided that any grant
awards disbursed from this appropriation be matched on a 90/10
basis by the recipient

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 36
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.345,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (110) ..................................................................... 334,665
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,571,543
Section 17.490. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.010, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.375, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ...........................................................................$9,414,256
Section 17.495. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements for a sewer project located in a city with more than
four thousand four hundred but fewer than four thousand nine
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than sixty
thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.380,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 37
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements of a sewer project in a city with more than one
thousand one hundred seventy but fewer than one thousand three
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than sixty
thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.380,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................797,980
For a water infrastructure project located in city with more than one
thousand one hundred seventy but fewer than one thousand three
hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.380,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................50,000
For drinking water and sewer infrastructure improvements in any city
with more than one thousand three hundred but fewer than one
thousand five hundred inhabitants and partially located in a
county with more than eight thousand but fewer than eight
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than three hundred but fewer than six hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.380,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .................................................................. 730,079
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,078,059
Section 17.505. To the Department of Natural Resources

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 38
For a flood protection improvement project located in city with more
than seven hundred sixty but fewer than eight hundred fifty-five
inhabitants and located in a county with more than seven
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than four hundred eighty inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.303, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.390,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Flood Resiliency Improvement Fund (1238) ......................................................$800,000
For a flood resiliency project in any county with more than five thousand
but fewer than six thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than nine hundred but fewer than one thousand six
hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.303, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.390,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Flood Resiliency Improvement Fund (1238) ............................................. 40,253
Total ..............................................................................................................................$840,253
Section 17.510. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the construction of a dump station located in Van Meter State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.352, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.395,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..............................................................................$500,000
For the construction of a public restroom located in Roaring River State
Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.352, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 39
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.395,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................... 125,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$625,000
Section 17.515. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and loans, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.235, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.396,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602) ..................................$237,321,836
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ................................................. 200,956,985
Total .......................................................................................................................$438,278,821
Section 17.520. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and loans, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.235, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602) ..................................$431,187,420
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ................................................. 260,291,005
Total .......................................................................................................................$691,478,425
Section 17.525. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.015, an Act of the 103rd

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 40
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$8,000,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .......................................................................2,250,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................... 3,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,250,000
Section 17.530. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the construction, installation, and maintenance of a flood wall and
lift pump for a city with more than one hundred eighty-five but
fewer than two hundred ten inhabitants and located in a county
with more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two
hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.234, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$400,000
Section 17.535. To the Department of Natural Resources
For sewer infrastructure improvements for a nursing facility located in
any city with more than six hundred eighty but fewer than seven
hundred sixty inhabitants and located in a county with more than
six thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than four hundred but fewer than one
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.236, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.540. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy
For the Missouri University of Science and Technology for a small
modular nuclear reactor science and development program
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.343, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$3,000,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 41
Section 17.545. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy to commission a distributed energy resources
study, which shall include a value of solar study along with the
practical and economic benefits, challenges, and drawbacks of
increased distributed energy generation in the state, and which
shall also include legislative and regulatory recommendations
related thereto to the Governor, the Public Service Commission,
and the General Assembly
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.342, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...............................................................................$500,000
Section 17.550. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy
For energy generation infrastructure for a performing arts and
entertainment complex in a city with more than fifty-one
thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.341, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 17.555. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
100th General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 42
Section 17.400, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) .............................................................$200,000
Section 17.560. To the Department of Conservation
For major improvements and repairs (including materials, supplies, and
labor) to buildings, roads, hatcheries, signage, and other
departmental structures; and for soil conservation activities,
erosion control, and land improvement on department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.055, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.405, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$3,000,000
Section 17.565. To the Department of Conservation
For stormwater and flooding repairs at George O. White State Forest
Nursery and Little River Conservation Area
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3020, Section 20.350, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.410, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.570. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 43
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.190, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.415,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$1,700,000
Section 17.575. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.015, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.420, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ........................................................$16,000,000
Section 17.580. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.020, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 44
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ........................................................$20,000,000
Section 17.585. To the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design, and construction of a park above an interstate
in any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.024, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.425,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$24,600,000
Section 17.595. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Housing Development Commission
For the general administration of affordable housing activities and
emergency aid
For housing subsidy grants or loans
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.030, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Missouri Housing Trust Fund (1254) .............................................................$25,000,000
Section 17.600. To the Department of Economic Development
For an organization committed to providing a safe and efficient
transportation system located in any county with more than two
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand
inhabitants for the purpose of maintenance, repair, and upgrades
to Route MM at the intersections of U.S. Highway 60 and I-44,
as well as the length of Route MM between said intersections
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.006, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,000,000
Section 17.605. To the Department of Economic Development
For distribution to any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand
but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants for the

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 45
planning, design, property acquisition, construction, renovation,
maintenance, and repair of a regional convention center complex,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.020, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$30,000,000
Section 17.610. To the Department of Economic Development
For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than fifty-
eight thousand but fewer than sixty-four thousand inhabitants that
is organized exclusively for charitable, religious, educational,
and scientific purposes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2007, Section 7.020, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.446,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,698,732
Section 17.611. To the Department of Economic Development
Any provider deemed incapable of fulfilling the provider’s
obligations to deploy broadband internet pursuant to Section
1.513 RSMo, shall be forever barred from the receipt of any new
state or federal monies for broadband projects if the default totals
more than 20% of obligated broadband serviceable locations
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.135, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Department of Economic Development Federal Fund (1129) ..................$1,755,139,227
Section 17.612. To the Department of Economic Development
For a nonprofit organization in a county with more than one hundred fifty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, for
the planning, design, and construction of a sports park and
demolition of current structures on the planned development site,
provided that local matching funds must be provided

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 46
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.020, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000
Section 17.613. To the Department of Economic Development
For renovation and upgrades of a facility focused on reshoring in any city
with more than eleven thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
five hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.046, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,032,282
Section 17.615. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance, repair,
and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol Troop
A Pre-Trip Building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.035, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$800,000
Section 17.620. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance, repair,
and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol Troop E
Crime Lab
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.040, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................$12,749,490

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 47
Section 17.625. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For construction and improvements to a regional law enforcement center
located in any county with more than two hundred sixty thousand
but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 8, Section 8.006, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 17.630. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the planning, design, maintenance, and construction of a training
facility for law enforcement in a city with more than eighty-five
thousand but fewer than ninety-five thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 8, Section 8.131, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 17.635. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For construction of a new columbarium wall, pre placed crypts, and
infrastructure upgrades throughout the cemetery grounds at
Springfield Veterans Cemetery
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.200, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.465,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .....................$6,067,581
Section 17.636. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Disaster Relief Fund
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.060, an Act of the 103rd

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 48
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session, and House Bill 2014, Section 14.210, an Act of
the 103rd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$180,639,104
Section 17.637. To the Department of Public Safety
For expenses of any City not within a county responding to a disaster for
which a presidential declaration has been requested by the
Governor, to provide relief associated with such disaster
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.065, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session, and House Bill 2014, Section 14.210, an Act of
the 103rd General Assembly, Second Regular Session
From Disaster Relief Fund (1220) .........................................................................$180,660,571
Section 17.640. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.030, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.480,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ...................................................................$3,333
Section 17.645. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of an addition to the aircraft maintenance
facility at AVCRAD Base in Springfield and design and
construction of a readiness center and maintenance hangar at
AVCRAD Base in Springfield
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.035, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.485,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ........................................................$101,791,753

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 49
Section 17.650. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.025, an Act of the
100th General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.490, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ...............................................................$662,808
Section 17.655. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.130, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.495,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ...............................................................$670,067
Section 17.660. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of an elevator at the Ike Skelton Training
Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.135, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.500,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .........................................................................$74,414
Section 17.665. To the Department of the National Guard
For capital improvements and maintenance and repair to a joint civilian
and military owned and operated airport located in a city with
more than seventy-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.395, an Act of the 101st

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 50
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.505,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$963,075
Section 17.670. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.060, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.510, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................$2,134,182
Section 17.675. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design, land acquisition, and construction of the Bellefontaine
Neighbors Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.065, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.515, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ..........................................................$15,763,361
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 5,994,911
Total .........................................................................................................................$21,758,272
Section 17.680. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction at the Albany Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.075, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.520, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 51
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$871,940
Section 17.685. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.205, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.525,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ..........................................................$29,996,157
Section 17.690. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design, land acquisition, and construction of the Bellefontaine
Neighbors Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.210, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.530,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,743,376
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ...................................................... 15,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,743,376
Section 17.695. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For land acquisition, renovation, and repairs at Jefferson Barracks
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.535, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,988,227
For the design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 52
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.535, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................29,982,672
For the renovation, construction, and upgrades to the Rosecrans Air
National Guard Base
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.535, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ...................................................... 28,600,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$62,570,899
Section 17.700. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.045, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ..........................................................$35,000,000
Section 17.705. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For the planning, design, maintenance, demolition, land acquisition, and
construction of a new Community Supervision Center in any
county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-
two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
six thousand but fewer than eight thousand five hundred
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 9, Section 9.250, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,000,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 53
Section 17.710. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new community supervisory center in the southwest region of
Missouri
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.220, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.540,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$10,160,393
Section 17.715. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of facilities
at the Fulton Reception and Diagnostic Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.225, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.545,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$13,435,217
Section 17.720. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design and construction of an inpatient children’s acute
psychiatric hospital located at a residential treatment facility in a
county with more than one million inhabitants operated by a non
profit entity that currently operates or is part of a health system
that operates acute/inpatient children’s psychiatric hospitals and
psychiatric residential treatment facilities with extensive
experience in trauma informed care and adapting the latest
neuroscience to treatment, offering youth full medical,
psychiatric, clinical, and educational services, provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.530, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.570,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 54
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$6,352,148
Section 17.725. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the construction of a 200-bed mental health hospital in conjunction
with a non-state governmental acute care hospital operating
inpatient behavioral health beds in a state-owned facility
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.099, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.555,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Federal Earnings Fund (1558) ......................................................................$135,000,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................86,828,600
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................... 29,994,532
Total .......................................................................................................................$251,823,132
Section 17.735. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For safety and security upgrades at the Southeast Missouri Mental Health
Center
Expense and Equipment
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2010, Section 10.315, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.573, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) .........................................$2,332,312
Section 17.740. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For a non-profit organization focused on veteran’s healthcare
headquartered in any city not within a county, working in
collaboration with an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance
Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, for the
renovation of facilities to expand access to mental health and
employment training for veterans with opioid use disorder and
co-occurring substance use disorders

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 55
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.115, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$250,000
Section 17.745. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design, construction, expansion, and operation of a
children’s behavioral health hospital and outpatient treatment
center of a hospital founded in 1879, and located in any city with
more than twenty-three thousand but fewer than twenty-seven
thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more than one
million inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.096, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,500,000
Section 17.750. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For an Autism Center headquartered in a city with more than one hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.410, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 17.755. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For repair and renovation of an organization that provides transitional
living and supportive housing for individuals in recovery from
alcohol and drugs, located in any county with more than fifty
thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than seventeen thousand but fewer than
twenty-one thousand inhabitants, and located in any county with
more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twenty-one
thousand but fewer than thirty-one thousand inhabitants

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 56
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.126, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$980,000
Section 17.760. To the Department of Mental Health
For an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance Treatment and
Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, located in any city not within
a county, with at least twenty years of experience and currently
in the process of renovating clinics, to meet increasing substance
use needs in the community through clinic and recovery housing
renovations and expanded telehealth access
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.095, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$750,000
Section 17.765. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the construction of a 200-bed mental health hospital in conjunction
with a non-state governmental acute care hospital operating
inpatient behavioral health beds in a state-owned facility
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.050, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Federal Earnings Fund (1558) ........................................................................$48,159,575
Section 17.770. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health
For the refurbishment of existing administration buildings for the
purpose of creating a 166 physician residency program located in
any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer
than two hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.765, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,625,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 57
Section 17.775. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction at the W.E. Sears Youth
Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.080, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.575, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,076,174
Section 17.780. To the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction at the Camp Avery Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.085, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017,
Section 17.630, an Act of the 102nd General Assembly, Second
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,700,000
Section 17.785. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new youth center in the St. Louis region
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.230, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section 17.585,
an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,119,138
Section 17.790. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For safety renovations and general operating expenses to a nonprofit
organization established in 1911 that enhances independence,
empowers individuals, and enriches the lives of people who are
visually impaired or blind located in a city not within a county

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 58
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.191, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.605 an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$32,443
Section 17.795. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit community organization founded in 1976 and located
in city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county to purchase a building for their
core operations and make any necessary renovations
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.249, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.625, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 17.800. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For capital improvements at a nonprofit community center that promotes
youth development, healthy and active living, and community
responsibility located in a city with more than sixteen thousand
but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the
county seat of a county with more than twenty-five thousand but
fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.258, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,300,000
Section 17.805. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization founded in 2017 to open a cooperatively
owned grocery store that will provide locally grown, fresh

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 59
produce from state farmers, and other locally sourced products
and meats located in any county with more than one million
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.292, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 17.810. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For a Child Assessment Center in a county with more than two hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.491, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$932,614
Section 17.815. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For a nonprofit healthcare foundation in any county with more than
twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than twelve thousand inhabitants, and in any county with more
than fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five
thousand five hundred but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.771, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,000,000
For a community owned, not-for-profit medical center located in any city
with more than eleven thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
five hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants, for the purchase of a surgical robot
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.771, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 60
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,000,000
For a hospital located in any city with more than ten thousand but fewer
than eleven thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five
thousand inhabitants for renovations and to purchase new
equipment
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.771, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For a not-for profit medical center located in any city with more than
sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants
and partially located in a county with more than thirty-five
thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants for
renovations and to purchase medical equipment
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.771, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,037,900
For the construction of a community health center located in a city not
within a county that will provide primary care, pharmaceutical,
and behavioral health services
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.771, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$31,037,900
Section 17.820. To the Office of Administration
For the Supreme Court
For capital improvement projects or capacity-building grants to serve
more children for the statewide court-appointed special advocacy
programs
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 12, Section 12.355, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session

SS SCS HCS HB 2017 61
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,500,000
Section 17.825. To the Office of Administration
For the Supreme Court
For planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
improvements to the Supreme Court building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.055, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) .............................................................................................................$2,168,112
Section 17.830. To the Missouri State Capitol Commission
For renovation and repair of restrooms in the capitol building, as well as
repair and renovations to mechanical, electrical, and plumbing
systems in the capitol building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 12, Section 12.535, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) .............................................................................................................$4,000,000
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund ...........................................................................................$708,466,472
Federal Funds ........................................................................................................2,557,388,205
Other Funds .......................................................................................................... 1,420,972,998
Total ....................................................................................................................$4,686,827,675
